Missouri, session 2026, SB1276.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 160.011 as enacted by senate bill no.
727, one hundred second general assembly, second regular
session, is repealed and six new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 105.1701, 105.1702, 160.011,
160.2800, 174.800, and 213.136, to read as follows:
105.1701. 1. (1) The governing body of a public
school, including an elementary school, high school, or
charter school, shall ensure that the following information
is displayed on the school website in a publicly accessible
location:
(a) All training materials, including materials for
instructors, concerning or used for staff and faculty
training on all matters of nondiscrimination, diversity,
equity, inclusion, race, ethnicity, sex, or bias, or any
combination of these concepts with other concepts;
(b) All instructional or curricular materials
concerning nondiscrimination, diversity, equity, inclusion,
race, ethnicity, sex, or bias, or any combination of these
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1276 2
concepts with other concepts. Such instructional materials
shall identify, at a minimum:
a. The title, author, organization, and any website
associated with each instructional material;
b. A brief description of the instructional material;
c. A link to the instructional material, if publicly
available on the internet, or information on how to request
review of a copy of the instructional material; and
d. The identity of the teacher, if the instructional
material was created by the teacher; and
(c) Any procedures for the documentation, review, or
approval of the training, instructional, or curricular
materials used for staff and faculty training or student
instruction at the school, including by the principal,
curriculum administrators, or other teachers.
(2) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to
require the digital reproduction or posting of copies of the
instructional materials themselves if such reproduction
would infringe upon copyrighted material; but in such cases,
original materials should still be linked, if possible, or
provided upon request, as required under subparagraph c. of
paragraph (b) of subdivision (1) of this subsection.
2. (1) Each state agency and political subdivision
shall post on its website in a publicly accessible location
all training materials, including materials for instructors,
for training provided to employees of the agency or
political subdivision on all matters of nondiscrimination,
diversity, equity, inclusion, race, ethnicity, sex, or bias,
or any combination of these concepts with other concepts,
except any materials that the agency or political
subdivision is required to keep confidential.

SB 1276 3
(2) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to
require the digital reproduction or posting of copies of the
instructional materials themselves if such reproduction
would infringe upon copyrighted material; but in such cases,
original materials should still be linked, if possible, or
provided upon request.
105.1702. 1. A public school, including an elementary
school, high school, or charter school, state agency, or
political subdivision shall not:
(1) Require or otherwise compel a student, teacher,
administrator, or other employee to affirm, adopt, or adhere
to any belief or concept that:
(a) One race, sex, ethnicity, religion, or national
origin is inherently superior or inferior to another race,
sex, ethnicity, religion, or national origin;
(b) An individual, by virtue of his or her race, sex,
ethnicity, religion, or national origin should be blamed for
actions committed in the past by other members of the same
race, sex, ethnicity, religion, or national origin; or
(c) An individual's moral character is necessarily
determined, in whole or in part, by his or her race, sex,
ethnicity, religion, or national origin;
(2) Use public funds to contract with, hire, or
otherwise engage consultants, trainers, or other persons to:
(a) Direct or otherwise compel a student, teacher,
administrator, or other employee to affirm, adopt, or adhere
to any belief or concept described in subdivision (1) of
this subsection; or
(b) Advocate concepts described in subdivision (1) of
this subsection, unless:

SB 1276 4
a. The school, agency, or political subdivision
expressly makes clear that it does not sponsor, approve, or
endorse such concepts or materials; and
b. The school, agency, or political subdivision
affords students, teachers, administrators, and other
employees the opportunity to opt out of any speeches by or
sessions with such outside contractors; or
(3) Require a student, teacher, administrator, or
other employee to attend or participate in a training,
seminar, continuing education, orientation, or therapy that
promotes any concept described in subdivision (1) of this
subsection.
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed as
prohibiting:
(1) Speech protected by the First Amendment of the
U.S. Constitution or Article I, Section 8 of the
Constitution of Missouri;
(2) Voluntary attendance at a training session,
seminar, continuing education, orientation, or therapy,
provided that no inducement or coercion for such attendance
exists;
(3) Access to sources on an individual basis that
advocate concepts described in subdivision (1) of subsection
1 of this section for the purpose of research or independent
study; or
(4) Discussion of concepts described in subdivision
(1) of subsection 1 of this section or the assignment of
materials that incorporate such concepts for educational
purposes, provided that the public school, including a
public primary school, public secondary school, or public
charter school, state agency, or political subdivision

SB 1276 5
expressly makes clear that it does not sponsor, approve, or
endorse such concepts or materials.
160.011. As used in chapters 160, 161, 162, 163, 164,
165, 167, 168, 170, 171, 177 and 178, the following terms
mean:
(1) "District" or "school district", when used alone,
may include seven-director, urban, and metropolitan school
districts;
(2) "Elementary school", a public school giving
instruction in a grade or grades not higher than the eighth
grade;
(3) "Family literacy programs", services of sufficient
intensity in terms of hours, and of sufficient duration, to
make sustainable changes in families that include:
(a) Interactive literacy activities between parents
and their children;
(b) Training of parents regarding how to be the
primary teacher of their children and full partners in the
education of their children;
(c) Parent literacy training that leads to high school
completion and economic self sufficiency; and
(d) An age-appropriate education to prepare children
of all ages for success in school;
(4) "Graduation rate", the quotient of the number of
graduates in the current year as of June thirtieth divided
by the sum of the number of graduates in the current year as
of June thirtieth plus the number of twelfth graders who
dropped out in the current year plus the number of eleventh
graders who dropped out in the preceding year plus the
number of tenth graders who dropped out in the second
preceding year plus the number of ninth graders who dropped
out in the third preceding year;

SB 1276 6
(5) "High school", a public school giving instruction
in a grade or grades not lower than the ninth nor higher
than the twelfth grade;
(6) "Metropolitan school district", any school
district the boundaries of which are coterminous with the
limits of any city which is not within a county;
(7) "Proxy discrimination", the use of a facially
neutral factor in student admissions that correlates with
race, sex, color, ethnicity, ancestry, or national origin
for the purpose of discriminating against or granting a
preference to any individual or group on the basis of race,
sex, color, ethnicity, ancestry, or national origin. "Proxy
discrimination" includes the use of regional or feeder
school caps, quotas, or bonuses; zip codes; other geographic
or socioeconomic factors; and peer-group characteristics
within feeder or other zoned schools, if such factors are
used individually or in combination with other factors for
the purpose of discriminating against or granting a
preference to any individual or group on the basis of race,
sex, color, ethnicity, ancestry, or national origin;
(8) "Public school" includes all elementary and high
schools operated at public expense;
[(8)] (9) "School board", the board of education
having general control of the property and affairs of any
school district;
[(9)] (10) "School term", a minimum of one thousand
forty-four hours of actual pupil attendance as scheduled by
the board pursuant to section 171.031 during a twelve-month
period in which the academic instruction of pupils is
actually and regularly carried on for a group of students in
the public schools of any school district, and, for a school
district that is located wholly or partially in a county

SB 1276 7
with a charter form of government or a school district that
is located wholly or partially in a city with more than
thirty thousand inhabitants, a minimum of one hundred sixty-
nine school days, as that term is defined in section
160.041, unless the district has adopted a four-day school
week as provided in section 171.028, in which case the
district school term shall have a minimum of one hundred
forty-two school days, as such term is defined in section
160.041. A school term may be within a school year or may
consist of parts of two consecutive school years, but does
not include summer school. A district may choose to operate
two or more terms for different groups of children. A
school term for students participating in a school flex
program as established in section 160.539 may consist of a
combination of actual pupil attendance and attendance at
college or technical career education or approved employment
aligned with the student's career academic plan for a total
of the required number of hours as provided in this
subdivision;
[(10)] (11) "Secretary", the secretary of the board of
a school district;
[(11)] (12) "Seven-director district", any school
district which has seven directors and includes urban
districts regardless of the number of directors an urban
district may have unless otherwise provided by law;
[(12)] (13) "Taxpayer", any individual who has paid
taxes to the state or any subdivision thereof within the
immediately preceding twelve-month period or the spouse of
such individual;
[(13)] (14) "Town", any town or village, whether or
not incorporated, the plat of which has been filed in the

SB 1276 8
office of the recorder of deeds of the county in which it is
situated;
(15) "Traditional academic success factors", the
following student admissions factors: standardized test
results that are not normed for different student groupings,
academic grades and similar academic records,
100 extracurricular activities and achievements that are
101 relevant to academic success, and academic recommendations
102 by teachers and other school officials;
103 [(14)] (16) "Urban school district", any district
104 which includes more than half of the population or land area
105 of any city which has not less than seventy thousand
106 inhabitants, other than a city which is not within a county.
160.2800. 1. All public schools, including charter
schools, with a selective admissions process shall publish a
comprehensive list of all factors and criteria that the
school, the admissions committee, and any other employee or
representative of the school may consider or use in the
admission decision-making process. This list shall include,
but not be limited to, any of the following factors and
criteria that may be considered or used:
(1) Academic qualifications, including GPA,
standardized test scores, and class rank;
(2) Extracurricular activities, community service, and
leadership experiences;
(3) Personal essays, statements of purpose, or other
written submissions;
(4) Letters of recommendation from teachers,
counselors, or other relevant individuals;
(5) Special talents, achievements, or awards;
(6) Socioeconomic background or other diversity-
related considerations;

SB 1276 9
(7) Legacy status;
(8) Financial or in-kind donations made by the
applicant, the applicant's family, or any person or business
associated with the applicant; and
(9) Any other factors that may be considered during
the evaluation process.
The list of factors and criteria shall be made publicly
available on the official website of each school and easily
accessible to prospective students, parents, and other
interested parties.
2. Each public school and charter school with a
selective admissions process shall submit an annual report
to the state board of education detailing all the admission
factors used during the previous academic year. The report
shall include the weight or significance assigned to each
factor, if applicable, and any changes made to the admission
criteria.
3. The state board of education shall compile the
reports received from public schools and charter schools and
publish a consolidated report that provides an overview of
the admission factors and their respective importance. This
consolidated report shall be made available to the public on
the website of the department of elementary and secondary
education.
4. No public school or charter school board member,
director, administrator, employee, or person making
admission decisions for a public school or charter school
shall:
(1) Discriminate against or grant preferential
treatment to any individual or group on the basis of race,
sex, color, ethnicity, ancestry, or national origin;

SB 1276 10
(2) Engage in proxy discrimination; or
(3) Seek information on students' race, sex, color,
ethnicity, ancestry, or national origin during the
application process for admission to such school unless
expressly required by federal law, and to the extent it is
required by federal law, and such information shall be
withheld to the maximum extent practicable from any
individual involved in admissions decisions to the end that
admissions decisions are blind as to the applicants' race,
sex, color, ethnicity, ancestry, and national origin.
5. In any civil action in a court of competent
jurisdiction challenging an instance of proxy discrimination
that violates this section, the plaintiff has the burden of
establishing a prima facie case of proxy discrimination
through statements, statistical evidence, projections, or
other evidence that a particular factor or combination of
factors other than traditional academic success factors was
selected at least in part for the purpose of discriminating
against or granting a preference to any individual or group
on the basis of race, sex, color, ethnicity, ancestry, or
national origin. To rebut such a prima facie case of proxy
discrimination, the defendant has the burden of proving that
the selection of the challenged factor or combination of
factors was solely for a lawful purpose and not for the
purpose of discriminating against or granting a preference
to any individual or group on the basis of race, sex, color,
ethnicity, ancestry, or national origin.
6. Any public school or charter school board member,
director, administrator, or employee may use traditional
academic success factors, and such use presumptively does
not constitute proxy discrimination. In any civil action in
a court of competent jurisdiction challenging the use of

SB 1276 11
traditional academic success factors, the plaintiff has the
burden of proving that the factors were manipulated,
weighted, or otherwise used with the specific intent of
discriminating against or granting a preference to an
individual or group on the basis of race, sex, color,
ethnicity, ancestry, or national origin and not simply with
knowledge that such use has or may have a disparate impact
on such individual or group.
7. Public schools and charter schools shall have a
grace period of nine months after August 28, 2026, to comply
with the disclosure requirements outlined in subsection 1 of
this section.
8. Noncompliance with this section may result in
penalties, including fines and potential loss of public
funding, as determined by the state board of education.
174.800. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Proxy discrimination", the use of a facially
neutral factor in student admissions that correlates with
race, sex, color, ethnicity, ancestry, or national origin
for the purpose of discriminating against or granting a
preference to any individual or group on the basis of race,
sex, color, ethnicity, ancestry, or national origin. "Proxy
discrimination" includes the use of regional or feeder
school caps, quotas, or bonuses; zip codes; other geographic
or socioeconomic factors; and peer-group characteristics
within feeder or other zoned schools, if such factors are
used individually or in combination with other factors for
the purpose of discriminating against or granting a
preference to any individual or group on the basis of race,
sex, color, ethnicity, ancestry, or national origin;

SB 1276 12
(2) "Traditional academic success factors", the
following student admissions factors: standardized test
results that are not normed for different student groupings,
academic grades and similar academic records,
extracurricular activities and achievements that are
relevant to academic success, and academic recommendations
by teachers and other school officials.
2. Each state college and university with a selective
admissions process shall publish a comprehensive list of all
factors and criteria that the school, the admissions
committee, and any other employee or representative of the
school may consider or use in the admission decision-making
process. This list shall include, but not be limited to,
any of the following factors and criteria that may be
considered or used:
(1) Academic qualifications, including GPA,
standardized test scores, and class rank;
(2) Extracurricular activities, community service, and
leadership experiences;
(3) Personal essays, statements of purpose, or other
written submissions;
(4) Letters of recommendation from teachers,
counselors, or other relevant individuals;
(5) Special talents, achievements, or awards;
(6) Socioeconomic background or other diversity-
related considerations;
(7) Legacy status;
(8) Financial or in-kind donations made by the
applicant, the applicant's family, or any person or business
associated with the applicant; and
(9) Any other factors that may be considered during
the evaluation process.

SB 1276 13
The list of factors and criteria shall be made publicly
available on the official website of each state college and
university and easily accessible to prospective students,
parents, and other interested parties.
3. Each state college and university with a selective
admissions process shall submit an annual report to the
coordinating board for higher education detailing all the
admission factors used during the previous academic year.
The report shall include the weight or significance assigned
to each factor, if applicable, and any changes made to the
admission criteria.
4. The coordinating board for higher education shall
compile the reports received from each state college and
university and publish a consolidated report that provides
an overview of the admission factors and their respective
importance. This consolidated report shall be made
available to the public on the website of the department of
higher education and workforce development.
5. No state college or university board member,
director, administrator, employee, or any person making
admission decisions for the state college or university
shall:
(1) Discriminate against or grant preferential
treatment to any individual or group on the basis of race,
sex, color, ethnicity, ancestry, or national origin;
(2) Engage in proxy discrimination; or
(3) Seek information on students' race, sex, color,
ethnicity, ancestry, or national origin during the
application process for admission to such school unless
expressly required by federal law, and to the extent it is
required by federal law, and such information shall be
withheld to the maximum extent practicable from any

SB 1276 14
individual involved in admissions decisions to the end that
admissions decisions are blind as to the applicants' race,
sex, color, ethnicity, ancestry, and national origin.
6. In any civil action in a court of competent
jurisdiction challenging an instance of proxy discrimination
that violates this section, the plaintiff has the burden of
establishing a prima facie case of proxy discrimination
through statements, statistical evidence, projections, or
other evidence that a particular factor or combination of
factors other than traditional academic success factors was
selected at least in part for the purpose of discriminating
against or granting a preference to any individual or group
on the basis of race, sex, color, ethnicity, ancestry, or
national origin. To rebut such a prima facie case of proxy
discrimination, the defendant has the burden of proving that
the selection of the challenged factor or combination of
factors was solely for a lawful purpose and not for the
purpose of discriminating against or granting a preference
to any individual or group on the basis of race, sex, color,
100 ethnicity, ancestry, or national origin.
101 7. Any college or university board member, director,
102 administrator, or employee may use traditional academic
103 success factors and such use presumptively does not
104 constitute proxy discrimination. In any civil action in a
105 court of competent jurisdiction challenging the use of
106 traditional academic success factors, the plaintiff has the
107 burden of proving that the factors were manipulated,
108 weighted, or otherwise used with the specific intent of
109 discriminating against or granting a preference to an
110 individual or group on the basis of race, sex, color,
111 ethnicity, or national origin and not simply with knowledge

SB 1276 15
112 that such use has or may have a disparate impact on such
113 individual or group.
114 8. State colleges and universities shall have a grace
115 period of nine months after August 28, 2026, to comply with
116 the disclosure requirements outlined in subsection 1 of this
117 section.
118 9. Noncompliance with this section may result in
119 penalties, including fines and potential loss of public
120 funding, as determined by the coordinating board for higher
121 education.
213.136. 1. The state, including any political
subdivision thereof, or any public university system,
community college district, or public school district, shall
not discriminate against, or grant preferential treatment
to, any individual or group on the basis of race, color,
national origin, ancestry, or sex in the operation of public
employment, public education, or public contracting.
2. This section shall apply only to action taken after
the section's effective date.
3. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted as:
(1) Prohibiting bona fide qualifications based on sex
which are reasonably necessary to the normal operation of
public employment, public education, or public contracting;
(2) Invalidating any court order or consent decree
which is in force as of the effective date of this section;
or
(3) Prohibiting action that must be taken to establish
or maintain eligibility for any federal program, where
ineligibility would result in a loss of federal funds to the
state.
4. The remedies available for violations of this
section shall be the same, regardless of the injured party's

SB 1276 16
race, sex, color, ethnicity, or national origin, as are
otherwise available for violations of then-existing state
antidiscrimination law.
5. This section shall be self-executing. If any part
or parts of this section are found to be in conflict with
federal law or the United States Constitution, the section
shall be implemented to the maximum extent that federal law
and the United States Constitution permit.
Section B. If any provision of section A of this act
or the application thereof to anyone or to any circumstance
is held invalid, the remainder of those sections and the
application of such provisions to others or other
circumstances shall not be affected thereby.
✓